Illinois, session 104th, HB5465.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Neurodegenerative Disease Patient Protection and Progress Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; legislative intent.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Neurodegenerative diseases, including Parkinson's 9    disease, atypical parkinsonism, amyotrophic lateral 10    sclerosis, Huntington's disease, multiple sclerosis, and 11    related neurodegenerative conditions impose substantial 12    human, social, and economic burdens on individuals, 13    families, and communities. Through coordinated State 14    action, the State can improve surveillance, research, 15    care, and support services, and a State plan and advisory 16    structure will facilitate better outcomes.17        (2) Certain environmental and occupational exposures, 18    including pesticides, solvents, and other toxic 19    substances, have been associated in scientific studies 20    with an increased risk of developing Parkinson's disease 21    or atypical parkinsonism, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, 22    Huntington's disease, multiple sclerosis, and related 23    neurodegenerative conditions. Prevention-oriented   HB5465- 2 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    education and risk-reduction strategies are important 2    components of public health planning and coordination 3    among State agencies is necessary to evaluate emerging 4    evidence, reduce avoidable exposures, and protect the 5    health of Illinois residents.6    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a 7coordinated framework to guide statewide planning, promote 8equitable access to specialty care and supportive services, 9strengthen data collection and research capacity, and provide 10regular public reporting on progress and outcomes, while 11ensuring that patient privacy is protected and that 12recommendations regarding environmental risk factors are 13developed through scientific review and interagency 14collaboration consistent with existing State authority. 15    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:16    "Advisory Council" means the Neurodegenerative Disease 17Advisory Council created under this Act.18    "Annual Report" means the single consolidated report 19required under this Act regarding the implementation of this 20Act.21    "Care coordination" means services that assist persons 22living with neurodegenerative diseases in navigating health 23care, social services, long-term services and supports, and 24related community resources.25    "Caregiver" means an individual 18 years of age or older   HB5465- 3 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1who, because of the age, disability, chronic illness, or 2functional limitation of another individual, regularly 3provides the care recipient with assistance or supervision 4necessary to support the care recipient's health, safety, or 5daily functioning, including assistance with activities of 6daily living or instrumental activities of daily living, and 7who is identified by the care recipient or the care 8recipient's legal representative as a caregiver. "Caregiver" 9does not include an individual who provides services to the 10care recipient for compensation as an employee or contractor 11in the ordinary course of a business or profession, including 12a health care professional or direct care worker, unless the 13individual is also a family member providing care outside the 14compensated relationship.15    "De-identified information" means health information that 16does not identify an individual and with respect to which 17there is no reasonable basis to believe the information can be 18used to identify an individual, consistent with applicable 19federal law and guidance.20    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.21    "Director" means the Director of Public Health.22    "Family member" means, with respect to a patient diagnosed 23with a neurodegenerative disease, the patient's spouse, civil 24union partner, or domestic partner; child (including a 25biological, adopted, step, or foster child, a legal ward, or a 26child for whom the patient or the individual stands in loco   HB5465- 4 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1parentis); parent (including a biological, adoptive, step, or 2foster parent, a legal guardian, or an individual who stood in 3loco parentis to the patient or the individual when the 4patient or the individual was a minor); sibling (including a 5biological, adopted, step, or half-sibling); grandparent or 6grandchild; in-law (including a mother-in-law, father-in-law, 7son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, or 8sister-in-law); or any other individual related to the patient 9by blood or affinity whose close association with the patient 10is the equivalent of a family relationship.11    "Fund" means the Neurodegenerative Disease Research and 12Program Fund under this Act.13    "Neurodegenerative disease" means Parkinson's disease or 14atypical parkinsonism, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, 15Huntington's disease, multiple sclerosis, and any related 16neurodegenerative condition included by the Department by 17rule.18    "Neurodegenerative Disease Coordinator" or "Coordinator" 19means the Department employee designated or hired by the 20Director to administer and coordinate the implementation of 21this Act.22    "Plan" means the State plan to address neurodegenerative 23diseases under this Act.24    "Registry" means the voluntary statewide clinical and 25population registry created under this Act.26    "Stakeholders" means persons and entities with an interest   HB5465- 5 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1in neurodegenerative disease policy, including persons living 2with these conditions, caregivers, clinicians, researchers, 3advocacy organizations, payers, and health systems.4    "Qualified researcher" means an individual affiliated with 5an Illinois-based academic institution, hospital, health 6system, nonprofit research organization, or other entity 7approved by the Department who seeks access to registry data 8for a specific research purpose and who agrees to applicable 9data use, privacy, and security requirements. 10    Section 15. Neurodegenerative Disease Advisory Council.11    (a) The Department shall convene a Neurodegenerative 12Disease Advisory Council within the Department.13    (b) The Advisory Council shall include the following 14members:15        (1) one or more members of the Senate appointed by the 16    President of the Senate;17        (2) one or more members of the Senate appointed by the 18    Minority Leader of the Senate;19        (3) one or more members of the House of 20    Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of 21    Representatives;22        (4) one or more members of the House of 23    Representatives appointed by the Minority Leader of the 24    House of Representatives;25        (5) one member appointed by the Governor representing   HB5465- 6 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    the Governor's Office; and2        (6) members appointed by the Governor as follows:3            (A) at least 2 licensed neurologists with 4        expertise in the listed conditions;5            (B) a palliative care clinician and a 6        rehabilitation clinician;7            (C) representatives of patient advocacy 8        organizations for Parkinson's disease or atypical 9        parkinsonism, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, 10        Huntington's disease, and multiple sclerosis;11            (D) at least 2 persons living with a 12        neurodegenerative disease or the caregiver or family 13        member of someone with a neurodegenerative disease;14            (E) a representative from academic or clinical 15        research institutions;16            (F) a representative from a State Medicaid or 17        health payer program;18            (G) a representative from the Department of 19        Financial and Professional Regulation with knowledge 20        of health care licensing; and21            (H) other members designated by the Director to 22        ensure geographic diversity, racial and ethnic 23        diversity, and socioeconomic diversity.24    (c) The Council shall operate as follows:25        (1) Each member of the Council shall be appointed for 26    a 2-year term and until the member's successor is   HB5465- 7 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    appointed. The Governor may stagger the members' terms to 2    ensure continuity in the performance of the Council's 3    responsibilities.4        (2) The Advisory Council shall meet initially no later 5    than 90 days after all of the members of the Advisory 6    Council listed in subsection (b) of this Section are 7    appointed, and at least quarterly thereafter, at the times 8    and places in the State that the Advisory Council 9    designates.10        (3) The Department shall provide administrative and 11    other support to the Advisory Council. The Department may 12    designate a third party to provide administrative support 13    in a paid or volunteer capacity. The Department may delay 14    the implementation of this subsection if the Department is 15    unable to find a third party to provide administrative 16    support to the Advisory Council.17        (4) Members of the Advisory Council shall receive no 18    compensation for their participation but, subject to 19    appropriation, may be reimbursed by the Department of 20    Human Services for expenses in connection with their 21    participation, including travel, subject to the rules of 22    the appropriate travel control board.23    (d) The Advisory Council shall have the following duties:24        (1) advise on development, implementation, and 25    revision of the Plan;26        (2) recommend best practices for clinical care, care   HB5465- 8 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    coordination, surveillance, and workforce training;2        (3) advise on the registry design, privacy, data 3    governance, and research priorities; and4        (4) recommend public awareness strategies and 5    equity-focused outreach.6    (e) The Advisory Council shall submit an Annual Report in 7accordance with Section 50 of this Act. 8    Section 20. Neurodegenerative Disease Coordinator.9    (a) The Director shall designate or hire a full-time 10Neurodegenerative Disease Coordinator within the Department.11    (b) The Department shall implement and administer this Act 12through the Coordinator, under the supervision of the 13Director, except where this Act requires action by the 14Director or the Advisory Council.15    (c) The Coordinator shall, at a minimum:16        (1) serve as the primary staff to the Advisory Council 17    and coordinate Advisory Council meetings, agendas, 18    materials, and stakeholder engagement;19        (2) coordinate development, publication, 20    implementation, and periodic updating of the Plan, 21    including tracking performance measures and progress on 22    measurable objectives;23        (3) administer and oversee the clinical and population 24    registry program, including provider outreach, enrollment 25    processes, data quality procedures, and coordination with   HB5465- 9 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    information technology and security functions;2        (4) develop and maintain the Department's public 3    website and dashboard required under this Act, consistent 4    with confidentiality requirements;5        (5) coordinate interagency consultation and external 6    partnerships to implement this Act, including coordination 7    with relevant State agencies and federally supported 8    research centers;9        (6) administer the Fund and grants program under this 10    Act, including development of grant criteria, solicitation 11    materials, scoring processes, and grant monitoring, in 12    consultation with the Council; and13        (7) prepare drafts of the annual reports required 14    under this Act for Department review and submission.15    (d) Except as authorized by the Department, nothing in 16this Section authorizes the Coordinator to adopt rules, 17execute intergovernmental agreements or memoranda of 18understanding, or approve disclosure of confidential registry 19information.20    (e) Unless otherwise expressly provided in this Act, any 21duty, power, or function assigned to the Director or the 22Department under this Act may be carried out through the 23Neurodegenerative Disease Coordinator or other Department 24staff under the Director's supervision. Nothing in this 25Section shall be construed to authorize the Coordinator to 26adopt rules or execute intergovernmental agreements or   HB5465- 10 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1memoranda of understanding, except as explicitly authorized by 2the Director. 3    Section 25. State plan to address neurodegenerative 4diseases.5    (a) Within 12 months after the effective date of this Act, 6the Coordinator, acting through and under the supervision of 7the Director, and with input from the Advisory Council, shall 8develop and publish a State plan to address neurodegenerative 9diseases.10    (b) At a minimum, the Plan shall include:11        (1) an epidemiologic assessment, including current 12    estimates of prevalence, incidence, and demographic 13    distribution for each condition and identification of data 14    gaps;15        (2) goals and measurable objectives (short-term and 16    long-term) for prevention (where applicable), diagnosis, 17    care, research, surveillance, workforce, and support 18    services;19        (3) strategy for improving early diagnosis and timely 20    access to specialists;21        (4) care coordination and caregiver support 22    strategies;23        (5) workforce development plan, including training for 24    neurologists, primary care clinicians, allied health 25    professionals, and long-term care staff;  HB5465- 11 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1        (6) a public awareness and education plan emphasizing 2    equity and culturally competent outreach;3        (7) data and registry integration strategy, including 4    mechanisms for secure data sharing and research access;5        (8) a research and innovation agenda with prioritized 6    areas for translational and clinical research;7        (9) recommendations for sustainable financing, 8    including public and private funding streams and potential 9    creation of a dedicated research or program fund; and10        (10) evaluation metrics and a schedule for monitoring, 11    reporting, and Plan updates at least every 5 years.12    (c) The Plan shall include a prevention-oriented component 13assessing environmental risk factors associated with 14neurodegenerative diseases, including pesticides, solvents, 15and other exposures, and shall identify education, voluntary, 16and regulatory recommendations for reducing public and 17occupational exposures in coordination with relevant State 18agencies. In developing the environmental risk factors 19component, the Council and the Department shall consult and 20coordinate, as appropriate, with the Environmental Protection 21Agency, the Department of Labor (including occupational safety 22and health functions), the Department of Agriculture, the 23Department of Natural Resources, and other relevant agencies 24to promote scientific review, alignment with existing 25authority, and stakeholder engagement. At a minimum, the 26assessment shall include:  HB5465- 12 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1        (1) the current scientific evidence on environmental 2    risk factors associated with neurodegenerative diseases, 3    including, but not limited to, pesticides (such as 4    paraquat), solvents, and other high-risk exposures;5        (2) implementation of information from consultation 6    with experts in toxicology, occupational health, 7    environmental health, and epidemiology, as well as 8    affected communities, in preparing assessments;9        (3) identification of high-priority environmental 10    exposures that warrant State-level action, including 11    phase-out, substitution, or stricter regulation; and12        (4) the recommended prevention, education, and 13    regulatory strategies to reduce public and occupational 14    exposures linked to neurodegenerative disease.15    (d) Reporting under this Section shall be provided 16according to the requirements under Section 50 of this Act. 17    Section 30. Statewide clinical and population registry.18    (a) The Department shall establish and maintain a 19voluntary statewide clinical and population registry to 20collect de-identified information and, with the patient's 21informed consent, limited identifying information, to: (i) 22improve understanding of burden imposed by neurodegenerative 23diseases, natural history, and outcomes, (ii) facilitate 24public health planning and service delivery, and (iii) support 25research consistent with applicable privacy protections.  HB5465- 13 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    (b) Participation in the registry shall be voluntary and 2require informed consent consistent with State and federal 3law. Providers may inform patients of the registry and assist 4with enrollment consistent with privacy rules.5    (c) A patient may decline to participate or may withdraw 6consent at any time. Withdrawal shall apply prospectively and 7shall not require the Department to retrieve or destroy 8information already disclosed or used in accordance with this 9Section and applicable data use agreements.10    (d) A health care provider may inform patients of the 11registry and may assist with enrollment and submission of 12information to the Department in a manner consistent with the 13federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 141996 and other applicable State and federal privacy 15requirements.16    (e) Core data elements may include diagnosis, date of 17diagnosis, demographic information, basic clinical staging or 18severity metrics, key comorbidities, treatments, outcomes, and 19patient-reported outcomes. The Director may add, modify, or 20remove data elements by rule if any added elements are 21reasonably necessary to accomplish the purposes of this 22Section and are subject to the privacy and security safeguards 23set forth in this Act.24        (1) The identity of, and any information or 25    combination of facts that tends to lead to the identity 26    of, any patient whose condition or treatment is submitted   HB5465- 14 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    to the registry is confidential, shall not be open to 2    public inspection or dissemination, and is exempt from 3    disclosure under Section 7 of the Freedom of Information 4    Act.5        (2) Without limiting paragraph (1) of this subsection 6    (e), the following data elements, alone or in combination, 7    are confidential, not subject to public inspection or 8    dissemination, and exempt from disclosure under Section 7 9    of the Freedom of Information Act: name, social security 10    number, street address, email address, telephone number, 11    fax number, medical record number, certificate or license 12    number, reporting source (unless permitted by the 13    reporting facility), age (unless aggregated for 5 or more 14    years), zip code (unless aggregated for 5 or more years), 15    and diagnosis date (unless aggregated for one or more 16    years for the entire State or for 3 or more years for a 17    single county).18        (3) The identity of any person claimed to be derived 19    from registry data is not admissible in evidence, and no 20    court shall compel production of registry information in 21    discovery if the court determines that the information 22    tends to lead to the identity of any person.23        (4) Except as provided by rule and as part of an 24    epidemiologic investigation, an officer or employee of the 25    Department may interview a patient named in a report made 26    under this Section, or relatives of the patient, only with   HB5465- 15 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    the express written consent of the patient or the 2    patient's legally authorized representative.3        (5) The Department shall maintain administrative, 4    technical, and physical safeguards to protect registry 5    information and shall use and disclose registry 6    information only in compliance with the federal Health 7    Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and 8    applicable State law.9    (f) The Department shall maintain a written data 10governance policy addressing data minimization, security 11controls, retention, permitted uses, and review and approval 12of requests for access.13        (1) Registry data may be used to inform public health 14    planning, improve care delivery, support research, and 15    evaluate program outcomes.16        (2) The Department may release de-identified 17    information and, as appropriate, limited data sets to 18    qualified researchers for specific research purposes 19    pursuant to procedures established by the Department, 20    including execution of a data use agreement and any 21    required human-subjects protections. Identifying 22    information shall not be released unless authorized by the 23    patient's informed consent or otherwise permitted by law.24        (3) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 25    Section, including standards for informed consent, 26    submission and validation of data, de-identification and   HB5465- 16 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    aggregation, access review procedures, and safeguards for 2    confidential or privileged information.3    (f) The Department shall maintain a public website for the 4registry that includes:5        (1) downloadable annual aggregate summaries on 6    incidence and prevalence of Parkinson's disease, atypical 7    parkinsonism, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, Huntington's 8    disease, and multiple sclerosis;9        (2) Advisory Council information; and10        (3) additional resources as determined by the 11    Department.12    (g) Reporting under this Section shall be provided 13according to the requirements under Section 50 of this Act. 14    (h) A hospital, laboratory, other facility, or physician 15and their officers, employees, and agents, shall not be held 16civilly liable for the good-faith release of information to 17the Department in accordance with this Section and rules 18adopted under this Section. 19    Section 35. Neurodegenerative Disease Research Support And 20Grant Fund.21    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Director shall establish 22a Neurodegenerative Disease Research and Program Fund as a 23special fund in the State treasury to make grants to public or 24private not-for-profit entities for the purpose of conducting 25neurodegenerative disease research. The Fund may receive   HB5465- 17 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1gifts, grants, and other private contributions. The Department 2shall deposit any private contributions received for the grant 3program created pursuant to this Act in the Fund.4    (b) Money in the Fund shall be used by the Department to 5cover costs associated with this Act, including, but not 6limited to, the following:7        (1) salary and benefits for the full-time position of 8    the Coordinator within the Department;9        (2) research grants and pilot projects focused on 10    diagnosis, treatment, care delivery, and health 11    disparities;12        (3) infrastructure to enhance clinical trials capacity 13    and the registry analytics;14        (4) workforce training and capacity building; and15        (5) public awareness campaigns and caregiver supports.16    (c) The Coordinator, in consultation with the Advisory 17Council, shall develop transparent grant criteria prioritizing 18scientific merit, potential for impact, equity, and 19collaboration.20    (d) Reporting under this Section shall be provided 21according to the requirements under Section 50 of this Act. 22    Section 40. Equity and rural access. 23    (a) In implementing this Act, the Department shall 24consider disparities in diagnosis, care, participation, and 25outcomes associated with race, ethnicity, income, rural   HB5465- 18 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1residence, disability, language access, and other social 2determinants of health and shall, to the extent practicable, 3incorporate strategies to reduce such disparities in the Plan 4and in programs administered under this Act.5    (b) The Department shall use reasonable efforts to ensure 6that outreach, enrollment opportunities, and program benefits 7under this Act are accessible statewide, including in rural 8areas and historically underserved communities.9    (c) Targeted outreach and funding may be prioritized for 10initiatives that demonstrably increase access, participation, 11or outcomes in historically underserved communities or rural 12areas, consistent with the objectives of the Plan and subject 13to appropriation. 14    Section 45. Coordination with federal programs, academic 15centers, and private partners. 16    (a) The Director shall coordinate activities under this 17Act with relevant federal agencies, federally supported 18research centers, academic medical centers, institutions of 19higher education, and private partners to leverage resources, 20align initiatives, and avoid duplication.21    (b) To the extent permitted by law, the Department may 22enter into intergovernmental agreements, memoranda of 23understanding, or other written agreements to facilitate 24technical assistance, data sharing, and collaborative 25research, provided that any sharing of information complies   HB5465- 19 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1with federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 2Act of 1996, applicable State privacy law, and the 3confidentiality provisions of this Act and is subject to 4appropriate data use or security terms. 5    Section 50. Reporting.6    (a) Beginning 12 months after the effective date of this 7Act and annually thereafter, the Department, with input from 8the Council, shall prepare, submit, and publish a single 9consolidated Annual Report regarding implementation of this 10Act. The Department shall submit the Annual Report to the 11Governor and the General Assembly and shall post the Annual 12Report on the Department's publicly available website, so long 13as no confidential or identifying information is disclosed.14    (b) At a minimum, the Annual Report shall include: 15        (1) plan implementation and progress toward measurable 16    objectives, including actions taken during the prior year 17    and progress on performance measures;18        (2) registry summary required under Section 30 of this 19    Act in de-identified or aggregate form, including 20    enrollment totals, demographic summaries, and any 21    incidence or prevalence summaries feasible to report 22    consistent with confidentiality protections;23        (3) care and access gaps identified in Illinois, 24    including barriers to diagnosis, specialty care, 25    supportive services, workforce capacity, and caregiver   HB5465- 20 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1    supports;2        (4) a summary of disparities and actions taken to 3    improve access statewide, including rural access and 4    historically underserved communities;5        (5) awards made from the Fund (if any), amounts, 6    recipients, purposes, and program outcomes or early 7    findings (if applicable);8        (6) a summary of emerging scientific evidence, 9    exposure-reduction education strategies, and any 10    recommendations developed in consultation with relevant 11    State agencies; 12        (7) recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or 13    administrative action;14        (8) the Plan required under Section 25 of this Act and 15    a draft Plan, which shall be made available for public 16    comment for at least 30 days prior to finalization; and17        (9) reports required under Section 15 and Section 35 18    of this Act.19    (c) The Department may maintain a public dashboard 20providing regular updates on select indicators, such as 21aggregate registry enrollment, grants awarded, and workforce 22metrics, consistent with privacy protections and 23confidentiality requirements under this Act. 24    Section 55. Limitations. Nothing in this Act shall be 25construed to require insurance coverage beyond what is   HB5465- 21 -LRB104 19999 BDA 33450 b1otherwise required by State or federal law, except as 2expressly provided by a future Act of the General Assembly. 3    Section 60. Rulemaking authority. The Department may adopt 4rules necessary to implement this Act, consistent with 5administrative procedure requirements. 6    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 7Section 5.1038 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)9    Sec. 5.1038. The Neurodegenerative Disease Research and 10Program Fund. 11    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 12severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.